District of Columbia statutes.
47-2716

Denial of medical or mental health services for inability to pay prohibited.

No person shall be denied the services enumerated in §§ 47-2713 to 47-2716 because of his or her inability to pay for those services.

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title IV, § 404, 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 2(d), 24 DCR 3343
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2716.
1973 Ed., § 47-2215a.